Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1790YH (5) 91 sc/js H.F. 326 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 35E.1 Definitions. 1 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 1. âCommissionâ means the commission of veterans affairs 4 established in section 35A.2. 5 2. âDepartmentâ means the Iowa department of veterans 6 affairs created in section 35A.4. 7 3. âHealth care practitionerâ means a practitioner as 8 defined in section 155A.3. 9 4. âHyperbaric oxygen treatmentâ means treatment, including 10 diagnostic testing and other related medical treatments, for 11 diabetic foot ulcers, traumatic brain injury, or post-traumatic 12 stress disorder prescribed by a health care practitioner that 13 utilizes, as part of the treatment, any of the following: 14 a. A hyperbaric chamber approved by the United States food 15 and drug administration. 16 b. A hyperbaric oxygen device that is approved by the United 17 States food and drug administration for investigational use 18 under the direction of an institutional review board with a 19 national clinical trial number. 20 5. âPilot programâ means the veterans recovery pilot program 21 established under section 35E.2. 22 6. âTraumatic brain injuryâ means an acquired injury to the 23 brain. âTraumatic brain injuryâ does not mean brain dysfunction 24 caused by congenital or degenerative disorders or birth trauma. 25 7. âTreatment facilityâ means a hospital as defined in 26 section 135B.1, an organized outpatient health facility as 27 defined in section 10A.711, or any other facility that is 28 authorized by the department to provide hyperbaric oxygen 29 treatment under this chapter. 30 8. âVeteranâ means a veteran as defined in section 35.1, a 31 member of the national guard or reserve forces of the United 32 States, and a former member of the national guard or reserve 33 forces of the United States who was discharged under honorable 34 conditions. 35 -1- LSB 1790YH (5) 91 sc/js 1/ 8 H.F. 326 9. âVeterans recovery fundâ means the veterans recovery fund 1 created in section 35E.3. 2 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 35E.2 Veterans recovery pilot program 3 ââ establishment ââ reports ââ rules. 4 1. The department shall establish a veterans recovery pilot 5 program, subject to sufficient moneys in the veterans recovery 6 fund to operate the pilot program, to provide hyperbaric oxygen 7 treatment and support services to eligible veterans who have 8 been diagnosed with a post-traumatic stress disorder or a 9 traumatic brain injury pursuant to the requirements of this 10 chapter. 11 2. The department shall adopt rules to implement and 12 administer this chapter. 13 3. By October 1 of each even-numbered year, the department 14 shall submit to the general assembly a biennial report 15 regarding the pilot program that includes an evaluation of the 16 effectiveness of the pilot program and the number of veterans 17 and treatment facilities participating in the pilot program. 18 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 35E.3 Veterans recovery fund. 19 1. A veterans recovery fund is created in the state treasury 20 under the control of the department. 21 2. The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated for 22 purposes of the pilot program, and any other devise, gift, 23 bequest, donation, federal or other grant, reimbursement of 24 payments made by any responsible third-party payor, repayment, 25 judgment, transfer, or payment intended to be used for the 26 purposes of the fund. 27 3. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department 28 and may be expended by the department for any of the following 29 purposes: 30 a. Expenses incurred by the department in administering the 31 pilot program. 32 b. Expenses authorized pursuant to a treatment plan approved 33 pursuant to section 35E.4 for hyperbaric oxygen treatment of a 34 veteran under the pilot program. 35 -2- LSB 1790YH (5) 91 sc/js 2/ 8 H.F. 326 c. Expenses authorized pursuant to a treatment plan approved 1 pursuant to section 35E.4 for any necessary travel and living 2 expenses of a veteran required to travel to obtain hyperbaric 3 oxygen treatment under the pilot program. 4 4. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or 5 earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. 6 Moneys in the fund may be used for cash flow purposes during a 7 fiscal year provided that any moneys so allocated are returned 8 to the fund by the end of that fiscal year. 9 5. For purposes of section 8.33, unencumbered or 10 unobligated moneys in the fund shall not revert but shall 11 remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated 12 until June 30, 2031. Any unencumbered or unobligated moneys 13 remaining in the fund as of June 30, 2031, shall not revert but 14 shall be transferred for deposit in the veterans trust fund 15 created in section 35A.13. 16 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 35E.4 Hyperbaric oxygen treatment ââ 17 treatment plan. 18 1. A treatment facility seeking reimbursement for providing 19 hyperbaric oxygen treatment to a veteran under the pilot 20 program shall, prior to providing such treatment, submit a 21 proposed treatment plan to the department in a manner as 22 prescribed by the department. 23 2. The proposed treatment plan shall include the following 24 information: 25 a. A prescription order for hyperbaric oxygen treatment 26 issued by a health care practitioner. 27 b. Information verifying the eligibility of the veteran to 28 receive treatment and that the treatment facility is authorized 29 to provide hyperbaric oxygen treatment. 30 c. An estimate of the costs for providing hyperbaric oxygen 31 treatment by the treatment facility. 32 d. An estimate of cost for reimbursing any necessary travel 33 and living expenses of the veteran required to travel to obtain 34 the hyperbaric oxygen treatment. 35 -3- LSB 1790YH (5) 91 sc/js 3/ 8 H.F. 326 e. Any other information required by the department. 1 3. Upon receipt of a proposed treatment plan, the department 2 and the commission shall approve or disapprove the treatment 3 plan within a reasonable time as established by rule. The 4 department shall not approve the treatment plan if moneys in 5 the veterans recovery fund are not sufficient to reimburse the 6 estimated costs and expenses provided in the proposed treatment 7 plan. The department shall notify the treatment facility 8 whether the treatment plan was approved or disapproved. 9 4. A treatment facility may, following approval of a 10 proposed treatment plan, submit a modified treatment plan if 11 actual expenses are anticipated to exceed the estimated costs 12 approved in the initial treatment plan. The department and the 13 commission shall approve or disapprove the modified treatment 14 plan, subject to sufficient moneys in the veterans recovery 15 fund for the increased expenses, and shall notify the treatment 16 facility within a reasonable time as established by rule 17 whether the modified treatment plan was approved or disapproved 18 within a reasonable time as established by rule. 19 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 35E.5 Provision of treatment ââ 20 reimbursement of expenses. 21 1. A treatment facility shall receive reimbursement of 22 expenses incurred in providing hyperbaric oxygen treatment 23 under the pilot program to a veteran if the department and the 24 commission have approved a treatment plan under section 35E.4 25 for the veteran. 26 2. A treatment facility that elects to provide hyperbaric 27 oxygen treatment to a veteran under the pilot program shall 28 provide the treatment without charge to the veteran. A veteran 29 receiving treatment under the pilot program is not liable for 30 the cost of treatment or expenses incurred under the pilot 31 program. 32 3. A treatment facility that elects to provide treatment 33 under the pilot program shall submit to the department regular 34 reports, in the form prescribed by the department, of the 35 -4- LSB 1790YH (5) 91 sc/js 4/ 8 H.F. 326 veteranâs measured health improvements under the treatment 1 plan and whether treatments are continuing or have concluded. 2 If hyperbaric oxygen treatment has concluded, the treatment 3 facility shall indicate the date the treatment concluded. 4 4. A treatment facility providing hyperbaric oxygen 5 treatment under the pilot program may submit a request for 6 reimbursement of expenses incurred by the treatment facility to 7 the department. The department shall approve the request and 8 reimburse the expenses from the veterans recovery fund if all 9 of the following criteria are met: 10 a. The hyperbaric oxygen treatment was provided according to 11 the approved treatment plan or modified treatment plan. 12 b. The expenses do not exceed the estimated cost of the 13 hyperbaric oxygen treatment as provided in the approved 14 treatment plan or modified treatment plan. 15 c. The treatment facility demonstrates in the reports 16 submitted to the department as required by subsection 3 that 17 the veteran is making measured health improvements or that 18 continuing treatment is recommended. 19 5. The department shall reimburse a veteran from moneys in 20 the veterans recovery fund for any travel and living expenses 21 incurred by the veteran receiving hyperbaric oxygen treatment 22 under the pilot program if the amount requested does not exceed 23 the estimated cost of travel and living expenses as provided in 24 the approved treatment plan or modified treatment plan. 25 6. After six months from the date specified in the reports 26 submitted to the department from a treatment facility that 27 treatment has concluded, the department shall notify the 28 treatment facility and veteran in writing of the expenses 29 that have been reimbursed and whether the amounts reimbursed 30 are less than the costs authorized to be reimbursed pursuant 31 to an approved treatment plan or modified treatment plan. 32 The written notification shall further notify the treatment 33 facility and the veteran that any requests for reimbursement 34 shall not be authorized if a request for reimbursement is not 35 -5- LSB 1790YH (5) 91 sc/js 5/ 8 H.F. 326 submitted within ninety days after receiving the notice unless, 1 prior to the ninety days, the treatment facility indicates that 2 treatment has not been completed. 3 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 35E.6 Repeal. 4 This chapter is repealed July 1, 2031. 5 Sec. 7. DIRECTIVE TO DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS. The 6 department of veterans affairs shall submit a notice of 7 intended action to the administrative rules coordinator and 8 the administrative code editor pursuant to section 17A.4, 9 subsection 1, paragraph âaâ, not later than January 1, 2026, 10 for the adoption of rules to implement and administer chapter 11 35E as enacted in this Act. 12